Nebraska, session 109, LB751.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. The Nebraska State Patrol shall conduct a study to determine
how to increase state criminal justice protective and investigative resources
for reporting and identifying missing Black women and children in Nebraska. The
Nebraska State Patrol shall work with the Commission on African American
Affairs to convene meetings with state and local law enforcement partners,
federal agencies, and urban community organizations to determine the scope of
the problem, identify barriers, and find ways to create partnerships to
increase reporting and investigation of missing Black women and children. The
Nebraska State Patrol shall work with the United States Department of Justice
to increase information sharing and resource coordination to focus on reporting
and investigating missing Black women and children in Nebraska. The Nebraska
State Patrol shall submit a report electronically to the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council by June 1, 2027, on the results of such study. Such report
shall include data and analysis of the number of missing Black women and
children in Nebraska, identification of barriers in providing state resources
to address the issue, and recommendations, including any proposed legislation,
to improve the reporting and identification of missing Black women and children
in Nebraska.
-1-